Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB366.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "qualifying offense" means a felony offense under:
(a) KRS Chapters 507, 508, 509, 510, 515, and 531, excluding KRS 509.070;
(b) KRS 511.020, 511.030, and 511.040;
(c) KRS 513.020, 513.030, and 513.040;
(d) KRS 524.055;
(e) KRS 530.020, 530.064, and 530.065; or
(f) Criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any of
the offenses listed under paragraphs (a) to (e) of this subsection.
(2) The entry of a judgment of conviction for a qualifying offense shall operate as an
application for an order of protection as issued under KRS Chapter 456, unless
the victim requests otherwise.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS Chapter 456:
(a) An order of protection applied for under this section may be issued by the
court that entered the judgment of conviction;
(b) The judgment of conviction shall constitute sufficient cause for the entry of
the order without the necessity of further proof being taken; and
(c) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the order may be
effective for the lifetime of the victim or defendant.
(4) If a person intentionally violates an order of protection issued under this section,
he or she shall be guilty of a violation of KRS 456.180.
(5) The expungement of a qualifying offense shall operate to vacate an order of
protection issued under this section. The circuit clerk shall forward the
expungement order vacating the order of protection to the agency designated for
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/5/2025 9:03 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 915
entry of order of protection records into the Law Information Network of
Kentucky.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/5/2025 9:03 AM Jacketed